Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.170

Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of a code city shall commence on the first day of January and end on the thirty-first day of December of each calendar year unless a different fiscal period is authorized by RCW 1.16.030, as amended.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.170.]